Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-703
Civil action; relief available.

(1) A civil action may be brought in any court with jurisdiction by the Attorney General against any person that knowingly or intentionally violates any provision of section 55-702. The court may:

(a) Issue an injunction;

(b) Order the person to make a payment of money unlawfully received from, or required to be refunded to, one or more servicemembers;

(c) Order the person to pay to the state the reasonable costs of the Attorney General's investigation and prosecution related to the action; and

(d) Order the person to pay a civil penalty not greater than five thousand dollars per violation.

(2) Relief may not be granted under subsection (1) of this section if relief for the violation has already been granted under the federal Servicemembers Civil Relief Act.

Laws 2018, LB682, § 3.